Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Article 7. Procurement Records and Reports.

Sec. 36.30.500.
Retention of procurement records.

Procurement records shall be retained and disposed of in accordance with records retention guidelines and schedules approved by the state archivist. Retained documents shall be made available to the attorney general or a designee upon request and proper receipt.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed bidding; multistep bidding, see 2 AAC 12, art. 3.

Sec. 36.30.510.
Records of contracts awarded under competitive sealed proposals.

A contract file open for public inspection shall be kept by the commissioner and the contracting agency for each contract awarded under competitive sealed proposals. The file kept by the commissioner must contain a summary of the information in the file of the contracting agency. The file kept by the contracting agency must contain

a copy of the contract;

the register of proposals prepared under AS

36.30.230

and a copy of each proposal submitted; and

the written determination to award the contract prepared under AS

36.30.250

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.520.
Records of single source and emergency procurements.

The commissioner shall maintain for a minimum of five years a record listing all single source procurement contracts made under AS

36.30.300

and emergency procurements made under AS

36.30.310

. The record must contain

each contractor’s name;

the amount and type of each contract; and

a listing of the supplies, services, professional services, or construction procured under each contract.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities and any agency to whom the commissioner of administration or the commissioner of transportation and public facilities has delegated procurement authority under AS

36.30.015

shall, by October 1 of each year, submit to the commissioner of administration records of the type specified in (a) of this section for emergency procurements made under AS

36.30.310

. The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall, even if procurement authority has been delegated under AS

36.30.015

to another agency, by October 1 of each year, submit to the commissioner of administration records of the type specified in (a) of this section for single source procurement contracts made under AS

36.30.300

. The commissioner of administration shall maintain these records as required by (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 30 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For single source procurement, see 2 AAC 12, art. 7.

Sec. 36.30.522.
Records of innovative procurements.

The commissioner and the contracting agency shall keep a file for each contract awarded under an innovative procurement process under AS

36.30.308

. The file is subject to inspection under the same standards as described in AS

36.30.140(b)

and

36.30.230

. The file kept by the commissioner must contain a summary of the information in the file of the contracting agency. The file kept by the contracting agency must contain

a copy of the contract;

the written determination under AS

36.30.308(a)

;

the procurement plan as approved as to form by the Department of Law;

the record of notice under AS

36.30.130

; and

the record of respondents to solicitation.

History.

(§ 31 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For innovative procurement, see 2 AAC 12, art. 11.

Sec. 36.30.530.
Public access to procurement information.

Procurement information is public except as otherwise provided by law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.540.
Procurement report.

The commissioner shall biennially prepare a report concerning procurements by agencies and notify the legislature that the report is available. The report must include

the records maintained by the commissioner under AS

36.30.510

and the records maintained under AS

36.30.520(a)

for the previous two fiscal years;

a list of procurements made under this chapter from out-of-state sources during the previous two fiscal years together with the total number of procurement contracts entered into during that period with out-of-state contractors and the total value of these contracts; this paragraph does not apply to procurements made under AS

36.30.320

; and

a list of procurements made under this chapter from state sources during the previous two fiscal years together with the total number of procurement contracts entered into during that period with state contractors and the total value of these contracts; this paragraph does not apply to procurements made under AS

36.30.320

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 4 ch 59 SLA 1994; am § 56 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former paragraphs (4) and (5) were renumbered as (2) and (3), respectively, in 1998 to reflect the 1998 repeal of former paragraphs (2), (3), and (6).